src/qnt_myv-lexc.txt
!Dealing with numerals up to 4 digits long
LEXICON Numerals
№+Symbl:№ # ;
I Roman-numerals ; !
II Roman-numerals ;
III Roman-numerals ;
IV Roman-numerals ;
V Roman-numerals ;
VI Roman-numerals ;
VII Roman-numerals ;
VIII Roman-numerals ;
IX Roman-numerals ;
X Roman-numerals ;
XI Roman-numerals ;
XII Roman-numerals ;
XIII Roman-numerals ;
XIV Roman-numerals ;
XV Roman-numerals ;
XVI Roman-numerals ;
XVII Roman-numerals ;
XVIII Roman-numerals ;
XIX Roman-numerals ;
XX Roman-numerals ;
D Roman-numerals ;
C Roman-numerals ;
L Roman-numerals ;
M Roman-numerals ;

1 Num-1a ;
2 Num-1a ;
3 Num-1a ;
4 Num-1a ;
5 Num-1a ;
6 Num-1a ;
7 Num-1a ;
8 Num-1a ;
9 Num-1a ;

LEXICON Num-1a
+Dig1: Num-1d ;

1 Num-1b ;
2 Num-1b ;
3 Num-1b ;
4 Num-1b ;
5 Num-1b ;
6 Num-1b ;
7 Num-1b ;
8 Num-1b ;
9 Num-1b ;
ZERO Num-1b ;


LEXICON Num-1b
+Dig2: Num-1d ;
1 Num-1c ;
2 Num-1c ;
3 Num-1c ;
4 Num-1c ;
5 Num-1c ;
6 Num-1c ;
7 Num-1c ;
8 Num-1c ;
9 Num-1c ;
ZERO Num-1c ;


LEXICON Num-1c
+Dig3: Num-1d ;
+Dig4:1 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:2 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:3 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:4 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:5 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:6 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:7 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:8 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:9 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:ZERO Num-1d ;


LEXICON Num-1d
+NOrd:-це # ;
+NCrd: # ;

!!Roman Numerals
LEXICON Roman-numerals
+Rom: # ; 


!!!Now regular



LEXICON Quants1
 Quants2 ;
+Ord:%>це Quants3 ;
+Ord+LV:%>V1це Quants3 ;

LEXICON Quants2
 Quants3 ;
< %+Coll:0 %+Attr:0 н с т  "@P.TLOSS.ON@">  Quants3 ;
< %+Coll:0 н е к "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
< %+Appr:0 %+Coll:0 ш к а н е к  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
+Coll:%>не Possessives2-Ill ;
+Appr+Coll:%>шкане Possessives2-Ill ;
+Coll:%>не Possessives2 ;
+Iter:%>ксть Clitics ;
+LV+Iter:%>V1ксть Clitics ;
+Appr+Iter:%>шкаксть Clitics ;
+LV+Appr+Iter:%>V1шкаксть Clitics ;

LEXICON Quants3
!Cx PossPx Tx PredPx Clitic
!Cases1 Possessives1 Tenses1 PredPersons1 Clitics
+Indet+Sg+Nom: Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Sg+Nom+Poss+3Sg:%>V1зО1 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Sg+Nom+Poss+3Sg:%>зО1 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Indet+Lat:%>V1в Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Indet+Lat:%>в Clitics ;


+NoVowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Sgm:%>м Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+1SgN:%>нУ4 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+2Sg:%>тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+3Sg:%>нзО1 Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+NoVowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+1Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:к %+NoVowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+2Pl:0  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:т %+NoVowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Sgm:%>V1м Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+1SgN:%>V1нУ4 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+2Sg:%>V1тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+3Sg:%>V1нзО1 Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:V1 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+VowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+1Pl:0  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:V1 0:н 0:к %+VowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+2Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:V1 0:с 0:т %+VowX:0 %+NoNum:0 %+NomGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;




+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Nom:%>сь Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Det+Sg+Nom:%>V1сь Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Gen:%>нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Dat:%>нтень Clitics ;
+VowX+Det+Sg+Gen:%>V1нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Det+Sg+Dat:%>V1нтень Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ill:%>зО1 Possessives2 ;
+VowX+Ill:%>V1зО1 Possessives2 ;

+VLoss+Indet+Pl:%>VLossтУ4 Tenses1 ;
+Indet+Pl:%>NoVLossтУ4 Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl:%>тне Tenses1 ;

+Abl:%>дО1 Possessives1 ;
+LV+Abl:%>V1дО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Gen:%>нь Tenses1 ;
+Dat:%>нень Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ill:%>с Clitics ;
+VowX+Gen:%>V1нь Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Ill:%>V1с Clitics ;

+Prl+Det+Sg:%>Г2а%>нть Clitics ;
+Abe+Det+Sg:%>втО1мО1%>нть Clitics ;
+Abl+Det+Sg:%>дО1%>нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Transl+Det+Sg:%>ксУ4%>нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ine+Det+Sg:%>сО1%>нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Ela+Det+Sg:%>стО1%>нть Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Comp+Det+Sg:%>шка%>нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Transl+Det+Sg:%>V1ксУ4%>нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Ine+Det+Sg:%>V1сО1%>нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Ela+Det+Sg:%>V1стО1%>нть Clitics ;
+VowX+Comp+Det+Sg:%>V1шка%>нть Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Abl:%>тне%>де Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Gen:%>тне%>нь Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Dat:%>тне%>нень Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Ill:%>тне%>с Clitics ;

+Prl:%>Г2а Possessives1 ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Transl:%>кс Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Ine:%>сО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Ela:%>стО1 Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Comp:%>шка Possessives1 ;
+NoVowX+Comp+Com:%>шкане Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Transl:%>V1кс Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Ine:%>V1сО1 Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Ela:%>V1стО1 Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Comp:%>V1шка Possessives1 ;
+VowX+Comp+Com:%>V1шкане Possessives1 ;

+Det+Pl+Prl:%>тне%>ва Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Abe:%>тне%>втеме Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Transl:%>тне%>кс Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Ine:%>тне%>сэ Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Ela:%>тне%>стэ Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Comp:%>тне%>шка Tenses1 ;

!Attributes
+Prl:%>Г2а Attributes2 ; 
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Attributes2 ;  
+NoVowX+Transl:%>кс Attributes2 ;
+NoVowX+Ine:%>сО1 Attributes2 ;  
+NoVowX+Ela:%>стО1 Attributes2 ;  
+NoVowX+Comp:%>шка Attributes2 ;  
+VowX+Transl:%>V1кс Attributes2 ;
+VowX+Ine:%>V1сО1 Attributes2 ; 
+VowX+Ela:%>V1стО1 Attributes2 ;
+VowX+Comp:%>V1шка Attributes2 ;
+Det+Pl+Prl:%>тне%>ва Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Abe:%>тне%>втеме Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Transl:%>тне%>кс Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Ine:%>тне%>сэ Attributes2 ; 
+Det+Pl+Ela:%>тне%>стэ Attributes2 ;
+Det+Pl+Comp:%>тне%>шка Attributes2 ; 
< %+TLoss:0 "@R.TLOSS.ON@"> Quants3_TLOSS ;

LEXICON Quants3_TLOSS
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:д 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Abl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Gen:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Dat:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:с %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ill:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Prl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:т 0:е 0:м 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Abe:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:к 0:с %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Transl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ine:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:т 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ela:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Comp:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Prl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:т 0:е 0:м 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Abe:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:к 0:с %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Transl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ine:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:т 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ela:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:е 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Comp:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 


LEXICON Attributes1
 Attributes2 ;
+Indet+Nom+Pl:%>тУ4  Tenses1 ;
+Indet+Ela:%>стО1 Clitics ;
+Indet+Transl:%>кс Clitics ;
+Indet+Nom+Sg: Clitics ;

LEXICON QNT
вейке+Qnt+Num:вейке Quants2 ;
вейте+Old+Qnt+Num:вейтИ2 Quants2 ;
кавто+Qnt+Num:кавто Quants1 ;
колмо+Qnt+Num:колмо Quants1 ;
ниле+Qnt+Num:ниле Quants1 ;
вете+Qnt+Num:вете Quants1 ;
кото+Qnt+Num:кото Quants1 ;
сисем+Qnt+Num:сисем Quants1 ;
кавксо+Qnt+Num:кавксо Quants1 ;
вейксэ+Qnt+Num:вейксэ Quants1 ;
кемень+Qnt+Num:кемень Quants1 ;
кевейкее+Qnt+Num:кевейкее Quants1 ;
кемгавтово+Qnt+Num:кемгавтово Quants1 ;
кемголмово+Qnt+Num:кемголмово Quants1 ;
кемнилее+Qnt+Num:кемнилее Quants1 ;
кеветее+Qnt+Num:кеветее Quants1 ;
кемготово+Qnt+Num:кемготово Quants1 ;
кемзисемге+Qnt+Num:кемзисемге Quants1 ;
кемгавксово+Qnt+Num:кемгавксово Quants1 ;
кевейксэе+Qnt+Num:кевейксэе Quants1 ;
кемвейкее+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемвейкее Quants1 ;
кемкавтово+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемкавтово Quants1 ;
кемколмово+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемколмово Quants1 ;
кемнилее+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемнилее Quants1 ;
кемветее+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемветее Quants1 ;
кемкотово+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемкотово Quants1 ;
кемсисемге+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемсисемге Quants1 ;
кемкавксово+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемкавксово Quants1 ;
кемвейксэе+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кемвейксэе Quants1 ;
комсь+Qnt+Num:комсь Quants1 ;
комсьвейкее+Qnt+Num:комсьвейкее Quants1 ;
комськавтово+Qnt+Num:комськавтово Quants1 ;
комськолмово+Qnt+Num:комськолмово Quants1 ;
комсьнилее+Qnt+Num:комсьнилее Quants1 ;
комсьветее+Qnt+Num:комсьветее Quants1 ;
комськотово+Qnt+Num:комськотово Quants1 ;
комсьсисемге+Qnt+Num:комсьсисемге Quants1 ;
комськавксово+Qnt+Num:комськавксово Quants1 ;
комсьвейксэе+Qnt+Num:комсьвейксэе Quants1 ;
колоньгемень+Qnt+Num:колоньгемень Quants1 ;
колмонькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:колмонькемень Quants1 ;
ниленьгемень+Qnt+Num:ниленьгемень Quants1 ;
ниленькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:ниленькемень Quants1 ;
ведьгемень+Qnt+Num:ведьгемень Quants1 ;
кодгемень+Qnt+Num:кодгемень Quants1 ;
ветенькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:ветенькемень Quants1 ;
котонькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:котонькемень Quants1 ;
сизьгемень+Qnt+Num:сизьгемень Quants1 ;
кавксоньгемень+Qnt+Num:кавксоньгемень Quants1 ;
вейксэньгемень+Qnt+Num:вейксэньгемень Quants1 ;
сизькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:сизьгемень Quants1 ;
кавксонькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:кавксоньгемень Quants1 ;
вейксэнькемень+Qnt+Num+Phonematic:вейксэньгемень Quants1 ;
сядо+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:сядУ2 Quants1 ;
пельсядо+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:пельсядУ2 Quants1 ;
кавтосядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:кавтосядУ2 Quants1 ;
колмосядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:колмосядУ2 Quants1 ;
нилесядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:нилесядУ2 Quants1 ;
ветесядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:ветесядУ2 Quants1 ;
котосядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:котосядУ2 Quants1 ;
сисемсядт+Qnt+Num+Phonematic+NMixedStem:сисемсядУ2 Quants1 ;
сисемзядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:сисемзядУ2 Quants1 ;
кавксосядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:кавксосядУ2 Quants1 ;
вейксэсядт+Qnt+Num+NMixedStem:вейксэсядУ2 Quants1 ;
тёжа+Qnt+Num:тёжа Quants1 ;
миллион+Qnt+Num:миллион Quants1 ;
эрьва+Pron+Qnt:эрьва Quants1 ;
зяро+Pron+Qnt:зяро Quants1 ;
зярыя+Pron+Qnt:зярыя Quants1 ;
зняро+Pron+Qnt:зняро Quants1 ;
знярыя+Pron+Qnt:знярыя Quants1 ;
ламо+Pron+Qnt:ламо Quants2 ;
аламо+Pron+Qnt:аламо Quants2 ;
аламне+Pron+Qnt+DimNE:аламне Quants2 ;
васенце+Qnt:васенце Quants3 ;
омбоце+Qnt:омбоце Quants3 ;
кавонст+Qnt+Num+Coll+Attr:кавонст Quants3 ;
веенст+Qnt+Num+Coll+Attr:веенст Quants3 ;
омбонст+Qnt+Num+Coll+Attr:омбонст Quants3 ;
